Illinois, session 104th, SB948.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Right to Privacy in the School Setting Act 5is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 75/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the Right 8to Privacy in the School Setting Act.9(Source: P.A. 98-129, eff. 1-1-14.)